Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2156YH (3) 91 sc/js H.F. 821 Section 1. Section 26.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. A governmental entity may use the 3 information provided on the contractor performance assessment 4 system created in section 26.17 to determine if a bidder is 5 responsible. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 26.17 Contractor performance 7 assessment system. 8 1. The department of administrative services shall create 9 and maintain a contractor performance assessment system on 10 an internet site accessible to governmental entities for 11 the purpose of assessing contractor performance on public 12 improvements under this chapter. 13 2. The department shall develop for use on the internet site 14 a performance grading system for architects, engineers, and 15 contractors who have performed work on a public improvement in 16 this state. The performance grading system shall be based on 17 performance metrics, including but not limited to all of the 18 following: 19 a. Whether the work was performed in a timely manner. 20 b. Whether the cost exceeded the amount budgeted and, if so, 21 by what amount. 22 c. The history of change orders. 23